New Jersey, session 222, S145.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  A taxpayer who is 62 years of age or older, blind, or disabled shall be allowed to deduct from the taxpayer's gross income medical expenses, not to exceed $50,000, paid during the taxable year by the taxpayer for the care of the taxpayer, the taxpayer's spouse, and the taxpayer's dependents, if those individuals are 62 years of age older, blind, or disabled, provided that the expenses are for qualified long-term care services.  For purposes of this act, qualified long-term care services means necessary diagnostic, preventive, therapeutic, curing, treating, mitigating, and rehabilitative services, and maintenance or personal care services, which are required by a chronically ill individual and are provided pursuant to a plan of care prescribed by a licensed health care practitioner. b.    Any amounts allowed as a deduction under this section shall not be allowed for amounts that are reimbursable to the taxpayer and shall not be allowed if the amounts are allowed as a deduction for medical expenses under N.J.S.54A:3-3. 2.    a.  A taxpayer who is 62 years of age or older, blind, or disabled shall be allowed to deduct from the taxpayer's gross income unreimbursed funeral expenses, not to exceed $50,000, paid during the taxable year by the taxpayer for the funeral of the taxpayer's spouse or the taxpayer's dependents, if those individuals were 62 years of age or older, blind, or disabled at the time of death. b.    Any amounts allowed as a deduction under this section shall not be allowed for amounts that are reimbursable to the taxpayer. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.